Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4745.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.66, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1i. new text end new text begin Felony; possession in state or local government buildings. new text end new text begin (a) A person who possesses a firearm within a building owned by the state or a local government, or within a portion of a building leased or otherwise controlled by the state or a local government, and used for the purpose of government administration, is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both. new text end new text begin (b) Unless a person is otherwise prohibited or restricted by law from possessing a firearm, this subdivision does not apply to: new text end new text begin (1) licensed peace officers or military personnel who are performing official duties; or new text end new text begin (2) a person who has written permission to possess a firearm within the building or space from the person having general control and supervision over the building or space. new text end new text begin (c) This subdivision does not apply to locations described in subdivision 1d or 1g. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end